North Carolina, session 2025, SB636.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INCREASE COMPENSATION FOR SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS
SECTION 1.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, in addition to any salary received
under the teacher salary schedule, school psychologists shall receive the following salary
supplements:
(1) The sum of six hundred fifty dollars ($650.00) per month.
(2) School psychologists who have a Nationally Certified School Psychologist
(NCSP) credential shall receive a salary supplement each month of twelve
percent (12%) of their monthly salary.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of eight million one hundred thousand
dollars ($8,100,000) in recurring funds to provide compensation increases for school
psychologists pursuant to this section.

PART II. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Article 21 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-316.6. School Psychologists Grant Program.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall establish the School Psychologists Grant
Program (Program) to improve the safety, mental health, and well-being of students by providing
grants to public school units to recruit school psychologists, to the extent funds are made
available for this purpose, as follows:
(1) Grant application. – A public school unit may submit an application to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to receive a grant pursuant to this
subdivision. The application shall identify current and ongoing needs for
school psychologist services, including needs related to recruitment.
(2) Criteria and guidelines. – The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
develop criteria and guidelines for the administration and use of the grants
under the Program, including any documentation required to be submitted by
applicants.
*S636-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Award of funds. – The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award grants
to public school units to provide signing bonuses to recruit school
psychologists, as follows:
a. The Department shall prioritize the award of funds to public school
units that do not employ a full-time school psychologist at the time the
application is submitted.
b. No individual bonus shall be greater than five thousand dollars
($5,000).
c. As a condition of accepting a signing bonus, a school psychologist
shall agree to remain employed in the public school unit for at least
one year.
d. Grants provided to public school units pursuant to the Program shall
be used to supplement and not to supplant State or non-State funds
already provided for these services.
(b) Report. – No later than April 1, 2026, and each subsequent year thereafter in which
funds allocated pursuant to this section are awarded, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
shall report on the Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the
Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the identity of each public school unit that
received a grant through the Program, the amount of funding provided to the public school unit,
and the use of funds by the public school unit."
SECTION 2.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of one million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($1,700,000) in recurring funds to establish and implement the School
Psychologists Grant Program pursuant to G.S. 115C-316.6, as enacted by this act.

PART III. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 3.(a) Article 21 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-316.7. School psychologists internship program.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall establish an internship program for school
psychologists in public school units. Participants in an approved full-time school psychology
preparation program shall receive up to a 10-month stipend during the internship period of the
program. The stipend shall be at the beginning salary of a school psychologist. The school
psychology preparation program where the intern is enrolled shall provide the Department of
Public Instruction with certification that the intern is an eligible full-time student.
(b) Field supervisors in public school units providing instruction to school psychology
interns receiving stipends in accordance with this section shall be eligible to receive one lump
sum salary supplement of between five hundred dollars ($500.00) and one thousand two hundred
dollars ($1,200) in an amount to be determined by the public school unit."
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to establish and implement the school psychologists internship program
pursuant to G.S. 115C-316.7, as enacted by this act.

PART IV. FUNDS FOR A VIRTUAL SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY TRAINING PROGRAM
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of five million dollars
($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to Appalachian State University (ASU) to
host a virtual school psychology training program at the ASU campus in Hickory, North Carolina.

Page 2 Senate Bill 636-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART V. INCREASE FUNDS FOR SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST TRAINING
PROGRAMS
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of one million six hundred thousand dollars
($1,600,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the following
constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina to support the school psychology
programs at those institutions with the goal of doubling the number of school psychologists
produced:
(1) Appalachian State University.
(2) East Carolina University.
(3) The University of North Carolina at Charlotte.
(4) The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.
(5) Western Carolina University.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 636-First Edition Page 3